Washington statutes.
RCW 19.315.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.86.010.

(2) "Rebate" means an offer to provide cash, credit, or credit towards future purchases, that is offered to consumers who acquire or purchase a specified product or service and that is conditioned upon the customer submitting a request for redemption after satisfying the terms and conditions of the offer. "Rebate" does not include: Any discount from the purchase price that is taken at the time of purchase; any discount, cash, credit, or credit towards a future purchase that is automatically provided to a consumer without the need to submit a request for redemption; or any refund that may be given to a consumer in accordance with a company's return, guarantee, adjustment, or warranty policies, or any company's frequent shopper customer reward program.

[ 2009 c 374 s 1.]